Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 9. PUBLIC SECURITIES

SUBTITLE E. PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO SECURITIES ISSUED BY MUNICIPALITIES

CHAPTER 1333. REVOCATION OF UNSOLD MUNICIPAL BONDS BY PETITION

Sec. 1333.001. BOND REVOCATION ELECTION REQUIRED. (a) The governing body of a municipality shall order an election to determine whether to revoke bonds unsold for 10 years or more after the date the bonds are authorized to be issued if the governing body receives a petition signed by a number of registered property tax paying voters equal to 10 percent of the property tax paying voters voting in the most recent municipal election.

(b) The election shall be held on the first authorized uniform election date prescribed by Chapter 41, Election Code, that allows sufficient time for compliance with any requirements established by law.

(c) A municipality shall hold the election in the same manner as an election to issue bonds in the municipality.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1333.002. BALLOT FORM. At the election, the ballots shall be printed to permit voting for or against the following proposition: "The revocation of the bonds."

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1333.003. ELECTION RESULTS; DESTRUCTION OF BONDS. (a) The governing body of the municipality shall record the results of an election held under this chapter in its minutes.

(b) If a majority of the qualified voters voting at the election vote in favor of the proposition, the governing body of the municipality shall revoke and burn the unsold bonds.

(c) The municipality shall send to the comptroller a certified copy of the minutes of the municipality showing the revocation and destruction of the bonds.

(d) On receipt of notice under Subsection (c), the comptroller shall cancel the registration of the bonds in the records of the comptroller.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1333.004. TAX ADJUSTMENT FOLLOWING REVOCATION. (a) The governing body of a municipality that revokes bonds under this chapter shall adjust the tax rate in the municipality to account for any change caused by the revocation.

(b) The municipality by order shall refund taxes collected for payment of bonds revoked under this chapter, less any properly chargeable claims, ratably to the taxpayers.

(c) The treasurer of the municipality shall keep a receipt of taxes refunded under Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.